Illinois, session 104th, SB248.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Section 122-1 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/122-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 122-1)7    Sec. 122-1. Petition in the trial court. 8    (a) Any person imprisoned in the penitentiary may 9institute a proceeding under this Article if the person 10asserts that:11        (1) in the proceedings which resulted in his or her 12    conviction there was a substantial denial of his or her 13    rights under the Constitution of the United States or of 14    the State of Illinois or both;15        (2) (blank); or 16        (3) (blank).17    (a-5) A proceeding under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) 18may be commenced within a reasonable period of time after the 19person's conviction notwithstanding any other provisions of 20this Article. In such a proceeding regarding actual innocence, 21if the court determines the petition is frivolous or is 22patently without merit, it shall dismiss the petition in a 23written order, specifying the findings of fact and conclusions   SB0248 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07557 RLC 17601 b1of law it made in reaching its decision. Such order of 2dismissal is a final judgment and shall be served upon the 3petitioner by certified mail within 10 days of its entry. 4    (b) The proceeding shall be commenced by filing with the 5clerk of the court in which the conviction took place a 6petition (together with a copy thereof) verified by affidavit. 7Petitioner shall also serve another copy upon the State's 8Attorney by any of the methods provided in Rule 7 of the 9Supreme Court. The clerk shall docket the petition for 10consideration by the court pursuant to Section 122-2.1 upon 11his or her receipt thereof and bring the same promptly to the 12attention of the court.13    (c) No proceedings under this Article shall be commenced 14more than 6 months after the conclusion of proceedings in the 15United States Supreme Court, unless the petitioner alleges 16facts showing that the delay was not due to his or her culpable 17negligence. If a petition for certiorari is not filed, no 18proceedings under this Article shall be commenced more than 6 19months from the date for filing a certiorari petition, unless 20the petitioner alleges facts showing that the delay was not 21due to his or her culpable negligence. If a defendant does not 22file a direct appeal, the post-conviction petition shall be 23filed no later than 3 years from the date of conviction, unless 24the petitioner alleges facts showing that the delay was not 25due to his or her culpable negligence. 26    This limitation does not apply to a petition advancing a   SB0248 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07557 RLC 17601 b1claim of actual innocence.2    (d) A person seeking relief by filing a petition under 3this Section must specify in the petition or its heading that 4it is filed under this Section. A trial court that has received 5a petition complaining of a conviction or sentence that fails 6to specify in the petition or its heading that it is filed 7under this Section need not evaluate the petition to determine 8whether it could otherwise have stated some grounds for relief 9under this Article.10    (e) (Blank).11    (f) Only one petition may be filed by a petitioner under 12this Article without leave of the court. Leave of court may be 13granted only if a petitioner demonstrates cause for his or her 14failure to bring the claim in his or her initial 15post-conviction proceedings and prejudice results from that 16failure. For purposes of this subsection (f): (1) a prisoner 17shows cause by identifying an objective factor that impeded 18his or her ability to raise a specific claim during his or her 19initial post-conviction proceedings; and (2) a prisoner shows 20prejudice by demonstrating that the claim not raised during 21his or her initial post-conviction proceedings so infected the 22trial that the resulting conviction or sentence violated due 23process.24    (g) A petitioner who was convicted of a felony offense 25committed when that person was under 21 years of age who seeks 26leave to file a successive post-conviction petition claiming   SB0248 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07557 RLC 17601 b1that his or her sentence violates Section 11 of Article I of 2the Illinois Constitution does not have to demonstrate cause 3as set forth in subsection (f) of this Section. 4(Source: P.A. 102-639, eff. 8-27-21; 103-51, eff. 1-1-24.) 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.